Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated to the State Board  of Parole and Post-Prison Super-
vision, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount  of
$9,209,630.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the amount of $11,254
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received  by the State Board of Parole
and Post-Prison Supervision.
SECTION 3.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Enrolled House Bill 5029 (HB 5029-A) Page 1
Passed by House June 15, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 22, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5029 (HB 5029-A) Page 2